North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of
Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance
Abuse Services.

Part 1. Policy.

§ 122C-101.
Policy.

Within the public system of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, there are area, county, and State facilities. An area authority or county program is the locus of coordination among public services for clients of its catchment area.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 13; 1993, c. 396, s. 3; 2001-437, s. 1.4.